Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.
Sec. 43.55.110.
Administration.

The department may adopt regulations for the purpose of making and filing reports required by this chapter and otherwise necessary to the enforcement of this chapter.

The department may require a sufficient bond from every person charged with the making and filing of reports and the payment of the tax. The bond shall run to the state and shall be conditioned upon the making and filing of reports as required by law, upon compliance with the regulations of the department, and for the prompt payment, by the principal on the bond, of all taxes due the state by virtue of this chapter.

If reports required have not been filed, or are insufficient to furnish the information required by the department, the department shall institute, in the name of the state upon relation of the department, the necessary action or proceedings to enjoin the person from continuing operations until the reports are filed.

Upon showing that the state is in danger of losing its claims or the property is being mismanaged, dissipated or concealed, a receiver shall be appointed at the suit of the state.

The department may require that returns, statements, reports, notifications, and applications filed under this chapter be filed electronically in a form and manner approved or prescribed by the department.

The department may require that payments required under this chapter be made electronically in a form and manner approved or prescribed by the department.

Notwithstanding AS 44.62, the department may issue, for the information and guidance of producers, explorers, and other interested persons, advisory bulletins stating the department’s interpretation of provisions of this chapter and of regulations adopted under this chapter. Unless otherwise provided by the department by regulation, interpretations stated in the advisory bulletins are not binding on the department or others.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may compensate a person who provides information to the department about noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter by an explorer or a producer of oil or gas if that information leads to the collection of additional taxes, penalties, or interest from the producer. The amount of compensation under this subsection may not exceed the lesser of $500,000 or 10 percent of the additional tax, penalty, or interest collected as a result of the information. A state employee or an agent of the state is not eligible for compensation under this subsection.

A person who, under (h) of this section, provides, in bad faith, to the department erroneous information about noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter by an explorer or producer of oil or gas shall pay to the

department all expenses related to the department’s investigation of the alleged noncompliance; and

explorer or producer about whom the noncompliance was alleged all expenses that are incurred by the explorer or producer relating to the department’s investigation of the alleged noncompliance.

History.

(§ 13 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 52 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For levy of tax, see 15 AAC 55, art. 4.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Secs. 43.55.120 — 43.55.130.
Noncompliance and false reports. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.
For criminal penalties, see AS 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.55.135.
Measurement.

For the purposes of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

, except as otherwise provided, oil is measured in terms of a “barrel of oil” and gas is measured in terms of a “cubic foot of gas.”

History.

(§ 16 ch 101 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.150

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

43.55.200

—

43.55.240

.

Sec. 43.55.140.
[Renumbered as AS 43.55.900.]

Sec. 43.55.150.
Determination of gross value at the point of production.

For the purposes of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

, the gross value at the point of production is calculated using the actual costs of transportation of the oil or gas, except when the

shipper of oil or gas is affiliated with the transportation carrier or with a person that owns an interest in the transportation facility;

contract for the transportation of oil or gas is not an arm’s length transaction; or

method or terms of transportation of oil or gas are not reasonable in view of existing alternative transportation options.

If the department finds that a condition in (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is present, the gross value at the point of production is calculated using the actual costs of transportation, or the reasonable costs of transportation as determined under this subsection, whichever is lower. The department shall determine the reasonable costs of transportation, using the fair market value of like transportation, the fair market value of equally efficient and available alternative modes of transportation, or other reasonable methods. Transportation costs fixed by tariff rates that have been adjudicated as just and reasonable by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska or another regulatory agency and transportation costs in an arm’s length transaction paid by parties not affiliated with an owner of the method of transportation shall be considered prima facie reasonable.

In determining the gross value of oil under this section, the department may not allow as reasonable costs of transportation

the amount of loss of or damage to, or of expense incurred due to the loss of or damage to, a vessel used to transport oil if the loss, damage, or expense is incurred in connection with a catastrophic oil discharge from the vessel into the marine or inland waters of the state;

the incremental costs of transportation of the oil that are attributable to temporary use of or chartered or substituted service provided by another vessel due to the loss of or damage to a vessel regularly used to transport oil and that are incurred in connection with a catastrophic oil discharge into the marine or inland waters of the state; and

the costs incurred to charter, contract, or hire vessels and equipment used to contain or clean up a catastrophic oil discharge.

History.

(§ 6 ch 107 SLA 1976; am § 92 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 1989; am § 24 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am § 53 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.150

” was substituted for “this chapter” in (a) of this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

43.55.200

—

43.55.240

.

In 1999, the current reference in subsection (b) to “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the enactment of (c) of this section by § 1, ch. 114, SLA 1989 (HCS CSSB 299(Res)), see 1989 Senate Journal 1507.

Sec. 43.55.160.
Determination of production tax value of oil and gas.

For oil and gas produced before January 1, 2022, except as provided in (b), (f), and (g) of this section, for the purposes of

AS

43.55.011(e)

(1) and (2), the annual production tax value of taxable oil, gas, or oil and gas produced during a calendar year in a category for which a separate annual production tax value is required to be calculated under this paragraph is the gross value at the point of production of that oil, gas, or oil and gas taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

, less the producer’s lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

for the calendar year applicable to the oil, gas, or oil and gas in that category produced by the producer during the calendar year, as adjusted under AS

43.55.170

; a separate annual production tax value shall be calculated for

oil and gas produced from leases or properties in the state that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than gas produced before 2022 and used in the state;

oil and gas produced from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude and that qualifies for a tax credit under AS

43.55.024(a)

and (b); this subparagraph does not apply to

gas produced before 2022 and used in the state; or

oil and gas subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

;

oil produced before 2022 from each lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin;

gas produced before 2022 from each lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin;

gas produced before 2022 from each lease or property in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin and used in the state, other than gas subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

;

oil and gas subject to AS 43.55.011(p) produced from leases or properties in the state;

oil and gas produced from leases or properties in the state no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than oil or gas described in (B), (C), (D), (E), or (F) of this paragraph;

AS

43.55.011(g)

, for oil and gas produced before January 1, 2014, the monthly production tax value of the taxable

oil and gas produced during a month from leases or properties in the state that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude is the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) and produced by the producer from those leases or properties, less 1/12 of the producer’s lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

for the calendar year applicable to the oil and gas produced by the producer from those leases or properties, as adjusted under AS

43.55.170

; this subparagraph does not apply to gas subject to AS

43.55.011(o)

;

oil and gas produced during a month from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, is the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) and produced by the producer from those leases or properties, less 1/12 of the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year applicable to the oil and gas produced by the producer from those leases or properties, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170; this subparagraph does not apply to gas subject to AS

43.55.011(o)

;

oil produced during a month from a lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin is the gross value at the point of production of the oil taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) and produced by the producer from that lease or property, less 1/12 of the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year applicable to the oil produced by the producer from that lease or property, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170;

gas produced during a month from a lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin is the gross value at the point of production of the gas taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) and produced by the producer from that lease or property, less 1/12 of the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year applicable to the gas produced by the producer from that lease or property, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170;

gas produced during a month from a lease or property outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin and used in the state is the gross value at the point of production of that gas taxable under AS 43.55.011(e) and produced by the producer from that lease or property, less 1/12 of the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year applicable to that gas produced by the producer from that lease or property, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170.

A production tax value calculated under this section may not be less than zero.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

43.55.150

, for purposes of calculating a monthly production tax value under (a)(2) of this section, the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas is calculated under regulations adopted by the department that provide for using an appropriate monthly share of the producer’s costs of transportation for the calendar year.

Irrespective of whether a producer produces taxable oil or gas during a calendar year or month, the producer is considered to have generated a positive production tax value if a calculation described in (a) of this section yields a positive number because the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for a calendar year under AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

are less than zero as a result of the producer’s receiving a payment or credit under AS

43.55.170

. An explorer that has obtained a transferable tax credit certificate under AS

43.55.023(d)

for the amount of a tax credit under former AS

43.55.023(b)

is considered a producer, subject to the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

, to the extent that the explorer generates a positive production tax value as the result of the explorer’s receiving a payment or credit under AS 43.55.170.

Any adjusted lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil or gas from a lease or property outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin that would otherwise be deductible by a producer in a calendar year but whose deduction would cause an annual production tax value calculated under (a)(1) or (h) of this section of taxable oil or gas produced during the calendar year to be less than zero may be used to establish a carried- forward annual loss under AS

43.55.165

(a)(3). A reduction under (f) or (g) of this section must be added back to the calculation of production tax values for that calendar year before the determination of a carried-forward annual loss under this subsection. However, the department shall provide by regulation a method to ensure that, for a period for which a producer’s tax liability is limited by AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p), any adjusted lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 and

43.55.170

that would otherwise be deductible by a producer for that period but whose deduction would cause a production tax value calculated under (a)(1)(E) or (F) or (h)(3) of this section to be less than zero are accounted for as though the adjusted lease expenditures had first been used as deductions in calculating the production tax values of oil or gas subject to any of the limitations under AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p) that have positive production tax values so as to reduce the tax liability calculated without regard to the limitation to the maximum amount provided for under the applicable provision of AS 43.55.011(o) or (p). Only the amount of those adjusted lease expenditures remaining after the accounting provided for under this subsection may be used to establish a carried-forward annual loss under AS

43.55.165(a)(3)

. In this subsection, “producer” includes “explorer.”

On and after January 1, 2014, in the calculation of an annual production tax value of a producer under (a)(1)(A) or (h)(1) of this section, the gross value at the point of production of oil or gas produced from a lease or property north of 68 degrees North latitude meeting one or more of the following criteria is reduced by 20 percent: (1) the oil or gas is produced from a lease or property that does not contain a lease that was within a unit on January 1, 2003; (2) the oil or gas is produced from a participating area established after December 31, 2011, that is within a unit formed under AS

38.05.180(p)

before January 1, 2003, if the participating area does not contain a reservoir that had previously been in a participating area established before December 31, 2011; (3) the oil or gas is produced from acreage that was added to an existing participating area by the Department of Natural Resources on and after January 1, 2014, and the producer demonstrates to the department that the volume of oil or gas produced is from acreage added to an existing participating area. This subsection does not apply to gas produced before 2022 that is used in the state or to gas produced on and after January 1, 2022. For oil and gas first produced from a lease or property after December 31, 2016, a reduction allowed under this subsection applies from the date of commencement of regular production of oil and gas from that lease or property and expires after three years, consecutive or nonconsecutive, in which the average annual price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast is more than $70 or after seven years, whichever occurs first. For oil and gas first produced from a lease or property before January 1, 2017, a reduction allowed under this subsection expires on the earlier of January 1, 2023, or January 1 following three years, consecutive or nonconsecutive, in which the average annual price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast is more than $70. The Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission shall determine the commencement of regular production of oil and gas for purposes of this subsection. A reduction under this subsection may not reduce the gross value at the point of production below zero. In this subsection, “participating area” means a reservoir or portion of a reservoir producing or contributing to production as approved by the Department of Natural Resources.

On and after January 1, 2014, in addition to the reduction under (f) of this section, in the calculation of an annual production tax value of a producer under (a)(1)(A) or (h)(1) of this section, the gross value at the point of production of oil or gas produced from a lease or property north of 68 degrees North latitude that does not contain a lease that was within a unit on January 1, 2003, is reduced by 10 percent if the oil or gas is produced from a unit made up solely of leases that have a royalty share of more than 12.5 percent in amount or value of the production removed or sold from the lease as determined under AS

38.05.180(f)

. This subsection does not apply if the royalty obligation for one or more of the leases in the unit has been reduced to 12.5 percent or less under AS

38.05.180(j)

for all or part of the calendar year for which the annual production tax value is calculated. This subsection does not apply to gas produced before 2022 that is used in the state or to gas produced on and after January 1, 2022. For oil and gas first produced from a lease or property after December 31, 2016, a reduction allowed under this subsection applies from the date of commencement of regular production of oil and gas from that lease or property and expires after three years, consecutive or nonconsecutive, in which the average annual price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast is more than $70 or after seven years, whichever occurs first. For oil and gas first produced from a lease or property before January 1, 2017, a reduction allowed under this subsection expires on the earlier of January 1, 2023, or January 1 following three years, consecutive or nonconsecutive, in which the average annual price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast is more than $70. The Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission shall determine the commencement of regular production for purposes of this subsection. A reduction under this subsection may not reduce the gross value at the point of production below zero.

For oil produced on and after January 1, 2022, except as provided in (b), (f), and (g) of this section, for the purposes of AS

43.55.011(e)(3)

, the annual production tax value of oil taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

produced by a producer during a calendar year

from leases or properties in the state that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude is the gross value at the point of production of that oil, less the producer’s lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

for the calendar year incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil and gas deposits located in the state north of 68 degrees North latitude or located in leases or properties in the state that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude, as adjusted under AS

43.55.170

;

before or during the last calendar year under AS

43.55.024(b)

for which the producer could take a tax credit under AS

43.55.024(a)

, from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than leases or properties subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

, is the gross value at the point of production of that oil, less the producer’s lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

for the calendar year incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil and gas deposits located in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin and south of 68 degrees North latitude, other than oil and gas deposits located in a lease or property that includes land north of 68 degrees North latitude or that is subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

or, before January 1, 2027, from which commercial production has not begun, as adjusted under AS

43.55.170

;

from leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(p) is the gross value at the point of production of that oil, less the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil and gas deposits located in leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(p) or, before January 1, 2027, located in leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude from which commercial production has not begun, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170;

from leases or properties in the state no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than leases or properties subject to (2) or (3) of this subsection, is the gross value at the point of production of that oil less the producer’s lease expenditures under AS 43.55.165 for the calendar year incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil and gas deposits located in the state south of 68 degrees North latitude, other than oil and gas deposits located in a lease or property in the state that includes land north of 68 degrees North latitude, and excluding lease expenditures that are deductible under (2) or (3) of this subsection or would be deductible under (2) or (3) of this subsection if not prohibited by (b) of this section, as adjusted under AS 43.55.170; a separate annual production tax value shall be calculated for

oil produced from each lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin;

oil produced from each lease or property outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than leases or properties subject to (3) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 25 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 54 — 57 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am §§ 18, 19 ch 51 SLA 2012; am §§ 28, 29 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 57 — 61 ch 14 SLA 2014; am §§ 26 – 28 ch 4 SLA 2016; am §§ 23, 24 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For applicability of the 2013 changes to subparagraph (a)(1)(E), see sec. 35, ch. 10, SLA 2013.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For levy of tax, see 15 AAC 55, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a); in (c), added three references to AS

43.55.011(p)

, and a reference to AS

43.55.160(a)(1)(F)

.

The 2013 amendment, effective retroactively to January 1, 2013, in (a)(1)(E), substituted “each” for “a” preceding “lease or property” and added “, other than gas subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

” at the end. The amendment effective August 19, 2013, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “, (f), and (g)” following “provided in (b)”, in (a)(1), substituted “tax value of taxable oil, gas, or oil and gas produced during a calendar year in a category for which a separate annual production tax value is required to be calculated under this paragraph” for “tax value of the taxable oil, gas, or oil and gas subject to this para- graph produced during a calendar year”, substituted “oil and gas in that category produced by the producer during the calendar year, as adjusted under AS

43.55.170

; a separate annual production tax value shall be calculated for” for “oil and gas, as applicable, produced by the producer from leases or properties, as adjusted under AS 43.55,170; this paragraph applies to”; in (a)(2)(B), inserted “and that qualifies for a tax credit under AS

43.55.024(a)

and (b)” following “68 degrees North latitude”; in (a)(2)(B)(i), added “gas” at the beginning; in (a)(1)(C) and (D), substituted “each lease or property” for “a lease or property”; in (a)(1)(G), substituted “leases or properties in the state” for “a lease or property”; in the introductory language of (a)(2), added “for oil and gas produced before January 1, 2014,”; added (f) and (g).

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote the introductory language in (a), which read, “Except as provided in (b), (f), and (g) of this section, for the purposes of”, and in (a)(1), substituted “AS

43.55.011(e)(1)

and (2)” for “AS

43.55.011(e)

”; in (c), in the first sentence, inserted “or (h)” following “calculated under (a)(1)”, and in the second sentence, inserted “, or (h)(3)” preceding “of this section”; in (f), near the beginning of the first sentence substituted “(a)(1)(A) or (h)(1)” for “(a)(1)”, and near the beginning of the second sentence inserted “or to gas produced on and after January 1, 2022” following “that is first used in the state”; in (g), in the first sentence substituted “(a)(1)(A) or (h)(1)” for “(a)(1)” near the beginning, and inserted “north of 68 degrees North latitude” following “from a lease or property”, and in the third sentence added “or to gas produced on and after January 1, 2022” at the end; added (h).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (f), added the third, fourth, and fifth sentences; in (g), added the fourth, fifth, and sixth sentences; in (h)(4), added “a separate annual production tax value shall be calculated for” at the end of the introductory language, added (h)(4)(A) and (B).

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (d), in the second sentence, deleted “taken a tax credit under AS

43.55.023(b)

or that has” following “An explorer that has”, inserted “former” preceding “AS

43.55.023(b)

” and substituted “by AS

43.55.011(e)

” for “under AS 43.55 011(e)”; in (e), in the first sentence, inserted “incurred to explore for, develop, or produce oil or gas from a lease or property outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin” following “AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

” and substituted “AS

43.55.165

(a)(3)” for “AS 43.55.023(b)”, added the second sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p)” for “AS

43.55.011(j)

, (k), (o), or (p)”, “(a)(1)(E) or (F) or (h)(3)” for “(a)(1)(C), (D), (E), or (F), or (h)(3)”, “AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p)” for “AS

43.55.011(j)

, (k), (o), or (p)”, and “AS

43.55.011

(o) or (p)” for “AS

43.55.011

((j), (k), (o), or (p)”, and in the fourth sentence substituted “AS

43.55.165(a)(3)

” for “AS 43.55.023(b)”.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 38, ch. 10, SLA 2013 provides that the 2013 amendment of (a)(1)(E) of this section is retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 10, SLA 2013 (SB 21), see 2013 Senate Journal 33 — 36.